100 . CHAPTER 4
further, there was considerable overlapping and confusion of authority among the departments.
Few of the London officials, moreover, had ever visited America; few knew very much about conditions there. What information they did gather came in large part from agents sent to England by the colonial assemblies to lobby for American interests. These agents, naturally, did nothing to encourage interference with colonial affairs. (The best known of them, Benjamin Franklin, represented not only his own colony, Pennsylvania, but also Georgia, New Jersey, and Massachusetts.)
It was not only the weakness of administrative authority in London and the policy of neglect that weakened England’s hold on the colonies. It was also the character of the royal officials in America-among them the governors, the collectors of customs, and naval officers. Some of these officeholders were able and intelligent; most were not. Appointments generally came as the result of bribery or favoritism, not as a reward for merit. Many appointees remained in England and, with part of their salaries, hired substitutes to take their places in America. Such deputies received paltry wages and thus faced great temptations to augment their incomes with bribes. Few resisted the temptation. Customs collectors, for example, routinely waived duties on goods when merchants paid them to do so. Even honest and well-paid officials usually found it expedient, if they wanted to get along with their neighbors, to yield to the colonists’ resistance to trade restrictions.
Resistance to imperial authority centered in the colonial legislatures. By the 1750s, the American assemblies had claimed the right to levy taxes, make appropriations, approve appointments, and pass laws for their respective colonies.
Powerful Their legislation was subject to veto by
Colonial the g°vernor or the Privy Council. But the Legislatures assemblies had leverage over the governor through their control of the colonial budget, and they could circumvent the Privy Council by repassing disallowed laws in slightly altered form. The assemblies came to look upon themselves as little parliaments, each practically as sovereign within its colony as Parliament itself was
in England.
The Colonies Divided
Despite their frequent resistance to the authority of London, the colonists continued to think of themselves as loyal English subjects. In many respects, in fact, they felt stronger ties to England than they did to one another. Tire and water,” an English traveler wrote, "are not more heterogeneous than the different colonies in North America.” New Englanders and Virginians viewed each other as something close to foreigners. A Connecticut man denounced the merchants of New York for their "frauds and unfair practices,” while a New Yorker condemned Connecticut because of the "low craft and cunning so incident to the people of that country.” Only an accident of geography, it seemed, connected these disparate societies to one another.
AN APPEAL FOR COLONIAL UNITY
This sketch, one of the first American editorial cartoons, appeared in Benjamin Franklin’s Philadelphia newspaper, the Pennsylvania Gazette, on May 9, 1754. It was meant to illustrate the need for intercolonial unity and, in particular, for the adoption of Franklin s Albany Plan. (The Library of Congress (LC-USZC4-5315)) Yet, for all their differences, the colonies could scarcely avoid forging connections with one another. The growth of the colonial population produced an almost continuous line of settlement along the seacoast and led to the gradual construction of roads and the rise of intercolonial trade. The colonial postal service helped increase communication. In 1691, it had operated only from Massachusetts to New York and Pennsylvania. In 1711, it extended to New Hampshire in the North; in 1732, to Virginia in the South; and ultimately, all the way to Georgia.
Still, the colonists were loath to cooperate even when, in 1754, they faced a common threat from their old rivals, the Albany Plan French, and France’s Indian allies. A conference of colonial leaders with delegates
from Pennsylvania, Maryland, New York, and New England was meeting in Albany in that year to negotiate a treaty with the Iroquois, as the British government had advised the colonists to do. The delegates stayed on to talk about forming a colonial federation for defense against the Indians. Benjamin Franklin proposed, and the delegates tentatively approved, a plan by which Parliament would set up in America "one general government” for all the colonies (except Georgia and Nova Scotia). Each colony would "retain its present constitution,” but would grant to the new general government such powers as the authority to govern all relations with the Indians. The central government would have a president general” appointed and paid by the king (just as colonial governors were) and a legislature (a "grand council ) elected by the colonial assemblies.
War with the French and Indians was already beginning when this Albany Plan was presented to the colonial assemblies. None approved it. "Everyone cries, a union is necessary,” Franklin wrote to the Massachusetts governor, "but when they come to the manner and form of the union, their weak noodles are perfectly distracted.”
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION
• 101 THE STRUGGLE FOR
THE CONTINENT
In the late 1750s and early 1760s, a great war raged through North America, changing forever the balance of power both on the continent and throughout much of the world. The war in America was part of a titanic struggle between England and France for dominance in world trade and naval power. The British victory in that struggle, known in Europe as the Seven Years’ War, rearranged global power and cemented England’s role as the world’s great commercial and imperial nation. It also cemented its control of most of the settled regions of North America.
In America, however, the conflict was the final stage in a long battle among the three principal powers in northeastern
An Uneasy North America: the English, the French, Balance of and the Iroquois. For more than a century
Power prior to the conflict known in America as the French and Indian War, these three groups had maintained an uneasy balance of power. The events of the 1750s upset that balance, produced a prolonged and open conflict, and established a precarious dominance for the
English societies throughout the region.
The French and Indian War was important to the English
colonists in America for another reason as well. By bringing the Americans into closer contact with British authority than ever before, it raised to the surface some of the underlying tensions in the colonial relationship.
New France and the Iroquois Nation
The French and the English had coexisted peacefully in North America for nearly a century. But by the 1750s, religious and commercial tensions began to produce new conflicts. The crisis began in part because of the expansion of the French presence in America in the late seventeenth century-a result of New Sources Louis XIV’s search for national unity and of Conflict increased world power. The lucrative fur trade drew immigrant French peasants deeper into the wilderness, while missionary zeal drew large numbers of French Jesuits into the interior in search of potential converts. The bottomlands of the Mississippi River valley attracted French farmers discouraged by the short growing
season in Canada.
By the mid-seventeenth century, the French Empire in America comprised a vast territory. Louis Joliet and Father Jacques Marquette, French explorers of the 1670s, journeyed together by canoe from Green Bay on Lake Michigan as far south as the junction of the Arkansas and Mississippi Rivers. A year later, Rene-Robert Cavelier, Sieur de La Salle, began the explorations that in 1682 took him to the delta of the Mississippi, where he claimed the surrounding country for France and named it Louisiana in the king’s honor. Subsequent traders and missionaries wandered to the southwest as far as the Rio Grande; and the explorer Pierre Gaultier de Varennes,
Sieur de La Verendrye, pushed westward in 1743 from Lake Superior to a point within sight of the Rocky Mountains. The French had by then revealed the outlines of, and laid claim to, almost the whole continental interior.
To secure their hold on these enormous claims, they founded a string of widely separated communities, fortresses,
France's	missions,	and trading posts. Fort Louis-
North	bourg, on	Cape Breton Island, guarded the
American	approach	to the Gulf of St. Lawrence.
Empire	Would-be	feudal lords established large
estates (seigneuries) along the banks of the
St. Lawrence River; and on a high bluff above the river stood the fortified city of Quebec, the center of the French Empire in America. To the south was Montreal, and to the west Sault Sainte Marie and Detroit. On the lower Mississippi emerged plantations much like those in the southern colonies of English America, worked by black slaves and owned by "Creoles” (white immigrants of French descent). New Orleans, founded in 1718 to service the French plantation economy, soon was as big as some of the larger cities of the Atlantic seaboard; Biloxi and Mobile to the east completed the string of French settlement.
But the French were not, of course, alone in the continental interior. They shared their territories with a large and powerful Indian population-in regions now often labeled the "middle grounds” (see p. 60)-and their relations with the natives were crucial to the shaping of their empire. They also shared the interior with a growing number of English traders and settlers, who had been moving beyond the confines of the colonial boundaries in the East. Both the French and the English were aware that the battle for control of North America would be determined in part by which group could best win the allegiance of native tribes-as trading partners and, at times, as military allies. The Indians, for their part, were principally concerned with protecting their independence. Whatever alignments they formed with the European societies growing up around them were generally marriages of convenience, determined by which group offered the most attractive terms.
The English-with their more advanced commercial economy-could usually offer the Indians better and more plentiful goods. But the French offered something that was often more important: tolerance. Unlike the English settlers, most of whom tried to impose their own social norms on the Native Americans they encountered, the French settlers in the interior generally adjusted their own behavior to Indian patterns. French fur traders frequently married Indian women and adopted tribal ways. Jesuit missionaries interacted comfortably with the natives and converted them to Catholicism by the thousands without challenging most of their social customs. By the mid-eighteenth century, therefore, the French had better and closer relations with most of the tribes of the interior than did the English.
The most powerful native group, however, had a different relationship with the French. The Iroquois Confederacy-the five Indian nations (Mohawk, Seneca, Cayuga, Onondaga, and Oneida) that had formed a defensive alliance in the fifteenth
102 . CHAPTER 4
century-had been the most powerful tribal presence in the Northeast since the 1640s, when they had fought-and won-a
The Iroquois bitter war against the Hurons. Once their
Confederacy major competitors were largely gone from the region, the Iroquois forged an important commercial relationship with the English and Dutch along the eastern seaboard-although they continued to trade with the French as well. Indeed, the key to the success of the Iroquois in maintaining their independence was that they avoided too close a relationship with either group and astutely played the French and the English against each other. As a result, they managed to maintain an uneasy balance of power
in the Great Lakes region and beyond.
The principal area of conflict among these many groups was
the Ohio Valley. The French claimed it. Several competing Indian tribes (many of them refugees from lands farther east, driven into the valley by the English expansion) lived there. English settlement was expanding into it. And the Iroquois were trying to establish a presence there as traders. With so many competing groups jostling for influence, the Ohio Valley quickly became a potential battleground.
European
Seeds of
Conflict
Anglo-French Conflicts
As long as England and France remained at peace in Europe, and as long as the precarious balance in the North American interior survived, the tensions among the English, French, and Iroquois remained mild. But after the Glorious Revolution in England, the English throne passed to one of Louis XIV’s principal enemies, William III, who was also the stadholder (chief magistrate) of the Netherlands and who had long opposed French expansionism. William’s successor,
Queen Anne (the daughter of James II), ascended the throne in 1702 and carried on the struggle against France and its new ally, Spain. The result was a series of Anglo-French wars that continued intermittently in Europe for nearly eighty years.
The wars had important repercussions in America. King William’s War (1689-1697) produced a few, indecisive clashes between the English and French in northern New England. Queen Anne’s War, which began in 1701 and continued for nearly twelve years, generated substantial conflicts: border fighting with the Spaniards in the South as well as with the
,7 7 Kj*
THE SIEGE OF LOUISBOURG, 1758
The fortress of Louisbourg, on Cape Breton Island in Nova Scotia, was one of the principal French outposts in eastern Canada during the French and Indian War. It took a British fleet of 157 ships nearly two months to force the French garrison to surrender. "We had not had our Batteries against the Town above a Week," wrote a British soldier afte the victory, "tho we were ashore Seven Weeks; the Badness of the Country prevented our Approaches. It was necessary to make Roads for the Cannon, which was a great Labour, and some Loss of Men; but the spirits the Army was in is capable of doing any Thing." (© The New Brunswick Museum, Saint John, NB)
French and their Indian allies in the North. The Treaty of Utrecht, which brought the conflict to a close in 1713, transferred substantial areas of French territory in North America to the English, including Acadia (Nova Scotia) and Newfoundland. Two decades later, European rivalries led to still more conflicts in America. Disputes over British trading rights in the Spanish colonies produced a war between England and Spain and led to clashes between the British in Georgia and the Spaniards in Florida. (It was in the context of this conflict that the last English colony in America, Georgia, was founded in 1733; see pp. 57-60.) The Anglo-Spanish conflict soon merged with a much larger European war, in which England and France lined up on opposite sides of a territorial dispute between Frederick the Great of Prussia and Maria Theresa of Austria. The English colonists in America were soon drawn into the struggle, which they called King George’s War; and between 1744 and 1748, they engaged in a series of conflicts with the French. New Englanders captured the French bastion at Louisbourg on Cape Breton Island; but the peace treaty that finally ended the conflict forced them (in bitter disappointment) to abandon it.
In the aftermath of King George’s War, relations among the English, French, and Iroquois in North America quickly deteriorated. The Iroquois (in what in retrospect appears a major blunder) began to grant trading concessions in the interior to English merchants. In the context of the already tense Anglo-French relationship in America, the decision to side with the British set in motion a chain of events disastrous for the Iroquois Confederacy. The French feared that the English were using the concessions as a first step toward expansion into French lands (which to some extent they were). They began in 1749 to construct new fortresses in the Ohio Valley. The English interpreted the French activity as a threat to their western settlements. They protested and began making military preparations and building fortresses of their own. The balance of power that the Iroquois had striven to maintain for so long rapidly disintegrated, and the five Indian nations allied themselves with the British and assumed an essentially passive role in the conflict that followed.
For the next five years, tensions between the English and the French increased. In the summer of 1754, the governor of Virginia sent a militia force (under the command of an Fort	inexperienced young colonel, George
Necessity Washington) into the Ohio Valley to challenge French expansion. Washington built a crude stockade (Fort Necessity) not far from the larger French outpost, Fort Duquesne, on the site of what is now Pittsburgh. After the Virginians staged an unsuccessful attack on a French detachment, the French countered with an assault on Fort Necessity, trapping Washington and his soldiers inside. After a third of them died in the fighting,
Washington surrendered.
That clash marked the beginning of what became the French and Indian War, the American part of the much larger Seven Years’ War that spread through Europe at the same time. It was the climactic event in the long Anglo-French struggle for empire.
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION
• 103 The Great War for the Empire
The French and Indian War lasted nearly nine years, and it proceeded in three distinct phases. The first phase lasted from the Fort Necessity debacle in 1754 until the expansion of the war to Europe in 1756. It was primarily a North American conflict, which the English colonists managed largely on their own.
The British provided modest assistance during this period, but they provided it so ineptly that it had little impact on the
Braddock struggle. The British fleet failed to prevent
Defeated the landing of large French reinforcements in Canada; and the newly appointed commander in chief of the British army in America, General Edward Braddock, failed miserably in a major effort in the summer of 1755 to retake the crucial site at the forks of the Ohio River where Washington had lost the battle at Fort Necessity. A French and Indian ambush a few miles from the fort left
Braddock dead and his remaining forces in disarray.
The local colonial forces, meanwhile, were preoccupied with defending themselves against raids on their western settlements by the Indians of the Ohio Valley. Virtually all of the tribes (except the Iroquois) were now allied with the French, having interpreted the defeat of the Virginians at Fort Duquesne as evidence of British weakness. Even the Iroquois, who were nominally allied with the British, remained fearful of antagonizing the French. They engaged in few hostilities and launched no offensive into Canada, even though they had, under heavy English pressure, declared war on the French. By late 1755, many English settlers along the frontier had withdrawn to the east of the Allegheny Mountains to escape the hostilities.
The second phase of the struggle began in 1756, when the governments of France and England formally opened hostilities and a truly international conflict (the Seven Years’ War) began. In Europe, the war was marked by a realignment within the complex system of alliances. France allied with its former enemy, Austria; England joined France’s former ally, Prussia. The fighting now spread to the West Indies, India, and Europe. But the principal struggle remained the one in North America, where so far England had suffered nothing but frustration and defeat.
Beginning in 1757, William Pitt, the English secretary of state (and future prime minister), began to transform the war William Pitt effort in America by bringing it for the first Takes Charge time fully under British control. Pitt himself began planning military strategy for the North American conflict, appointing military commanders, and issuing orders to the colonists. Military recruitment had slowed dramatically in America after the defeat of Braddock. To replenish the army, British commanders began forcibly enlisting colonists (a practice known as "impressment”). Officers also began to seize supplies and equipment from local farmers and tradesmen and compelled colonists to offer shelter to British troops-all generally without compensation. The Americans had long ago become accustomed to running their own affairs and had been fighting for over two years without
The First Global War

m TJ TJ French and Indian War in North America was only a small part of a much larger con-1 ll uflict. Known in Europe as the Seven Years' War it was one of the longest, most widespread, and most important wars in modern history. "Ministers in this country, where every part of the World affects us, in some way or another, should consider the whole Globe," the Duke of Newcastle wrote in Britain in 1758, reflecting the international achievements and war aims of the British in the mid-eighteenth century. Two centuries later, Winston Churchill, the former British prime minister, wrote of the Seven Years' War as the first "World War."
In North America, the war was a result of tensions along the frontiers of the British Empire, but a larger war resulted from conflicts among the great powers in Europe. It began in the 1750s with what historians have called a "diplomatic revolution." Well-established alliances between Britain and the Austro-Hungarian Empire, and between France and Prussia, collapsed, replaced by new alliances that set Britain and Prussia against France and Austria. The instability that these changing alliances produced helped speed the European nations toward war. The one thing that did not change was the continuing rivalry between Britain and France.
The Austrian-British alliance collapsed because Austria suffered a series of significant defeats at the hands of the Prussians. To the British government, these failures suggested that the Austro-Hungarian
Empire was now too weak to help Britain balance French power. As a result, Britain sought new partnerships with the rising powers of northern Germany, Austria's enemies. Seeking protection from the power of their former British allies, the Austrians allied with France. Russia, concerned about the Austro-Hungarian Empire's possible dominance in central Europe, allied with Britain and Prussia.
The tensions that these complicated realignments created eventually led to war (just as the complicated alliances in Europe in the early twentieth century helped produce World War I). The European part of the war was a result of the continuing conflict between Prussia and Austria and the effect of those wars on the allies of both. The Seven Years' War soon spread across much of the world, engaging not only most of the great powers in Europe, from England to Russia, but also the emerging
104
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION * 105
colonial world—India, West Africa, the Caribbean, and the Philippines— as the powerful British navy worked to strip France, and eventually Spain, of their valuable colonial holdings.
Like most modern conflicts, the Seven Years' War was a struggle for economic power. Colonial possessions, many European nations believed, were critical to their future wealth, well worth fighting for. The war's outcome affected not only the future of America, but also the distribution of power through much of the world. It destroyed the French navy and much of the French Empire, and it elevated Great Britain to undisputed preeminence among colonial powers—especially when, at the conclusion of the war, India and all of eastern North America fell firmly under English control. The war also reorganized the balance of power in Europe, with Britain now preeminent among the great powers and Prussia (later to become the core of modern Germany) rapidly rising in wealth and military power.
The Seven Years' War was not only one of the first great colonial wars; it was also one of the last great wars of religion. It extended the dominance of Protestantism in Europe. In what is now Canada, the war replaced French with British rule and thus Catholic with Protestant rule. The Vatican, no longer a military power itself, had relied on the great Catholic empires—Spain, France, and Austria-Hungary—as bulwarks of the Vatican's power and influence. The shift of power toward Protestant governments in Europe and North America weakened the Catholic Church and reduced its geopolitical influence.
The conclusion of the Seven Years' War strengthened Britain and Germany and weakened France. But it did not provide any lasting solution to the rivalries among the great colonial powers. In North America, a dozen years after the end of the war, the American Revolution—the origins of which were in many ways a direct result of the Seven Years' War—stripped the British Empire of one of its most important and valuable colonial appendages. By the time the American Revolution came to an end, the French Revolution had sparked another lengthy period of war, culminating in the Napoleonic Wars of the early nineteenth century, which once again redrew the map of Europe and, for a while, the world. •
much assistance or direction from the British. They resented these new impositions and firmly resisted them-at times, as in a 1757 riot in New York City, violently. By early 1758, the friction between the British authorities and the colonists was threatening to bring the war effort to a halt.
Beginning in 1758, therefore, Pitt initiated the third and final phase of the war by relaxing many of the policies that Americans found oppressive. He agreed to reimburse the colonists for all supplies requisitioned by the army. He returned control over military recruitment to the colonial assemblies (which resulted in an immediate and dramatic increase in enlistments). And he dispatched large numbers of additional troops to America.
Finally, the tide of battle began to turn in England's favor. The French had always been outnumbered by the British colonists; after 1756, the French colonies suffered as well from a series of poor harvests. As a result, they were unable to sustain their early military successes. By mid-1758, the British regulars (who did the bulk of the fighting) and the colonial militias were Siege of seizing one French stronghold after another. Quebec Two brilliant English generals, Jeffrey
Amherst and James Wolfe, captured the fortress at Louisbourg in July 1758; a few months later Fort Duquesne fell without a fight. The next year, at the end of a siege of Quebec, supposedly impregnable atop its towering cliff, the army of General James Wolfe struggled up a hidden ravine under cover of darkness, surprised the larger forces of the
B IC
KEKST^Ftl BOSTON
ALYiANACK. Fur the Year of our LORD,
i 7 7 2.
Being LEAP YEAR.
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	How did the Seven Years' War change the balance of power among the nations of Europe? Who gained and who lost in the war?
2.	What effect did the war's outcome have on the European colonies in North America?
3.	Why is the Seven Years' War described as "one of the most important wars in modern history"?
Pail firrt of Patriots I whbfe exteofive mind, Revolves the vitft concernments of mankind : Contending realms accept controul from thee ;
And Britos’s glory hangs on thy decree :
deals deflru&ton, Peace her. olive brings.,
As thy fnpreme dire&ion, governs Kings.
Wh«re‘er thou bid'll, the wreaths of conqiteft tall, The guide, the f*iend, the guardian of us all.
........ 11111 '' \..—............*~ ■ '.............:
Q 8 T $ X »
primed by JOHN FLKMlKG, aad to be Sold at ,hi» £85/ V) XlfcC STREET, oppolte the	af the roH'h-HOVSE.
rPrke favea Copper J Haile, and 251, Old Tenor « p. 4 d. Uw&lthr Do*en.
r _ »	———     —- :'j■■ ■
WILLIAM PITT THE ELDER
This dedication on the cover of the Bickerstaff Boston Almanac in 1772 honors the British statesman who voiced his support for the American colonialists in the years leading to the Revolution. (© Corbis) 106 • CHAPTER 4
Marquis de Montcalm, and defeated them in a battle in which both commanders died. The dramatic fall of Quebec on September 13, 1759, marked the beginning of the end of the American phase of the war. A year later, in September 1760, the French army formally surrendered to Amherst in Montreal.
Not all aspects of the struggle were as romantic as Wolfe’s dramatic assault on Quebec. The British resorted at times to such brutal military expedients as population dispersal. In Nova Scotia, for example, they uprooted several thousand French inhabitants, whom they suspected of disloyalty, and scattered them throughout the English colonies. (Some of these Acadians eventually made their way to Louisiana, where they became the ancestors of the present-day Cajuns.) Elsewhere, English and colonial troops inflicted even worse atrocities on the Indian allies of the French-for example, offering "scalp bounties” to those who could bring back evidence of having killed a native. The French and their Indian allies retaliated, and hundreds of families along the English frontier perished in brutal raids on their settlements.
Peace finally came after the accession of George III to the British throne and the resignation of Pitt, who, unlike the new king, wanted to continue hostilities. The British achieved most of Pitt’s aims nevertheless in the Peace of Peace of Paris Paris, signed in 1763. Under its terms, the French ceded to Great Britain some of their West Indian islands and most of their colonies in India. They also transferred Canada and all other French territory east of the Mississippi, except New Orleans, to Great Britain. They ceded New Orleans and their claims west of the Mississippi to Spain, thus surrendering all title to the main-
land of North America.
The French and Indian War had profound effects on the British Empire and the American colonies. It greatly expanded England’s territorial claims in the New World. At the same time, it greatly enlarged Britain’s debt; financing the vast war had been a major drain on the treasury. It also generated substantial resentment toward the Americans among British
British victory French victory —1British advance
—French advance
v*	British forces led by Wolfe
capture Quebec on Sept. 18,1759 ,
*
French surrender Montreal
T	on Sept. 8,1760\YA<
‘British trQops'capture Ta ,
Fort Carillorr (Ticonderoga) 13 ? e .
'. ,'Fort Frontenac captured by / on Ju|y 8-1758j	a\n
the British on August 28,1758	/	-?7^>Colonial troops defeated -M?'
Crown Point'fal! of 175^r''
‘ British surrender FortWillliam
X
LQy ? Henry on August 9,1757 7 ’'*Ft N-H-\ f.t Oswego Niagara
Albany^ ?	Boston,
MAINE
OF MASS.)
British deport 6,000 Acadian farmers and disperse them among the colonies, summer of 1755
O C I A N
Braddock defeated by French and Indian troops at Fort Duquesne on July 9, ,175!
NEW YORK
PENNSYLVANIA
Washington surrenders at -^Tjort Necessity on July 4,1754
' MARYLAfsJ©;
VIRGINIA
Philadelphia
X DELAWARE
MASS.
R.h.-Z
N.J.4
X*pi
«, .............................................................................
Lax.
f
;	Havana
A (	;
Etenqbvh o $ sugar islands .. Senegal
1758
France and Britain
..
Pondicherry
1761
szszt	in the Pennsyivania backcountry',he Brifeh
was worldwide, with naval superiority providing the
J
French waged their final contest for supremacy in North needed edge to Britain.
A



$

5 !


THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION - 107
leaders, many of whom were contemptuous of the colonists for what they considered American military ineptitude during the war. They were angry as well that the colonists had made so few financial contributions to a struggle waged largely for American benefit; they were particularly bitter that some colonial merchants had been selling food and other goods to the French in the West Indies throughout the conflict. All these factors combined to persuade many English leaders that a major reorganization of the empire, giving London increased authority over the colonies, would be necessary in the aftermath of the war.
The war had an equally profound but very different effect on the American colonists. It forced them, for the first time, to act in concert against a common foe. The friction of 1756-1757 over British requisition and impressment policies, and
Consequences of the Seven Years’ War
the 1758 return of authority to the colonial assemblies, established an important precedent in the minds of the colonists: it seemed to confirm the illegitimacy of English interference in local affairs. For thousands of
Americans-the men who served in the colonial armed forces-the war was an important socializing experience. The colonial troops, unlike the British regiments, generally viewed themselves as part of a "people’s army.” The relationship of soldiers to their units was, the soldiers believed, in some measure voluntary; their army was a communal, not a coercive or hierarchical, organization. The contrast with the British regulars, whom the colonists widely resented for their arrogance and arbitrary use of power, was striking; and in later years, the memory of that contrast helped to shape the American response to British imperial policies.
For the Indians of the Ohio Valley, the third major party in the French and Indian War, the British victory was disastrous. Those tribes that had allied themselves with the French had earned the enmity of the victorious English. The Iroquois Confederacy, which had allied with Britain, fared only slightly better. English officials saw the passivity of the Iroquois during the war (a result of their effort to hedge their bets and avoid antagonizing the French) as evidence of duplicity. In the aftermath of the peace settlement, the Iroquois alliance with the British quickly unraveled, and the Iroquois Confederacy itself began to crumble from within. The Iroquois nations would continue to contest the English for control of the Ohio Valley for another fifty years; but increasingly divided and increasingly outnumbered, they would seldom again be in a position to deal with their white rivals on terms of military or political equality.
THE NEW IMPERIALISM
With the treaty of 1763, England found itself at peace for the first time in more than fifty years. But saddled with enormous debts and responsible for vast new lands in the New World, the imperial government could not long avoid expanding its involvement in its colonies.
Burdens of Empire
VERSUS
Territorial
Imperialists
The experience of the French and Indian War suggested that such increased involvement would not be easy to achieve. Not only had the colonists proved so resistant to British control that Pitt had been forced to relax his policies in 1758, but the colonial assemblies had continued after that to respond to British needs slowly and grudgingly. Unwilling to be taxed by Parliament to support the war effort, the colonists were generally reluctant to tax themselves as well. Defiance of imperial trade regulations and other British demands continued, and even increased, through the last years of the war.
The problems of managing the empire became more difficult after 1763 because of a basic shift in Britain’s imperial design. In the past, the English had viewed their colonial em-
Commercial Pire Primar^Y terms of trade; they had opposed acquisition of territory for its own sake. But by the mid-eighteenth century, a growing number of English and American leaders (including William Pitt and
Benjamin Franklin) were beginning to argue that land itself was of value to the empire-because of the population it could support, the taxes it could produce, and the imperial splendor it would confer. The debate between the old commercial imperialists and the new territorial ones came to a head at the conclusion of the French and Indian War. The mercantilists wanted England to return Canada to France in exchange for Guadeloupe, the most commercially valuable of the French "sugar islands” in the West Indies. The territorialists, however, prevailed. The acquisition of the French territories in North America was a victory for, among others, Benjamin Franklin, who had long argued that the American people would need these vast spaces to accommodate their rapid and, he believed, limitless growth.
With the territorial annexations of 1763, the area of the British Empire was suddenly twice as great as it had been, and the problems of governing it were thus considerably more complex. Some British officials argued that the empire should restrain rapid settlement in the western territories. To allow Europeans to move into the new lands too quickly, they warned, would run the risk of stirring up costly conflicts with the Indians. Restricting settlement would also keep the land available for hunting and trapping.
Many colonists wanted to see the new territories opened for immediate development, but they disagreed among themselves about who should control the western lands. Colonial governments made fervent, and often conflicting, claims of jurisdiction. Other colonists argued that control should remain in England, and that the territories should be considered entirely new colonies, unlinked to the existing settlements. There were, in short, a host of problems and pressures that the British could not ignore.
At the same time, the government in London was running out of options in its effort to find a way to deal with its staggering war debt. Landlords and merchants in England itself were objecting strenuously to increases in what they already considered
108 • CHAPTER 4
HUDSON’S BAY COMPANY
CAROLINA . Columbia • k^gston
/ ' 6	( Augusta*.	m
(Claimed by Spain and Britain) / I \	' x ’
DISPUTED TERRITORY
GEORGIA^ y ^^harles Town ^Savannah
NON-INDIAN
SETTLEMENT
Before 1700
1700-1763
Frontier Line Proclamation line of 1763 Fort
Provincial Capital
■; T
250
500 km
THE THIRTEEN COLONIES IN 1763
This map is a close-up of the thirteen colonies at the end of the Seven Years' War. It shows the line of settlement established by the Proclamation of 1763 (the red line), as well as the extent of actual settlement in that year (the blue line). Note that in the middle colonies (North Carolina, Virginia, Maryland, and southern Pennsylvania), settlement had already reached the red line—and in one small area of western Pennsylvania moved beyond it—by the time of the Proclamation of 1763. Note also the string of forts established beyond the Proclamation line. * How do the forts help to explain the efforts of the British to restrict settlement? And how does the extent of actual settlement help explain why it was so difficult for the British to enforce their restrictions?
excessively high taxes. The necessity of stationing significant numbers of British troops on the Indian border after 1763 was
Britain’s adding even more to the cost of defending
Staggering the American settlements. And the half-
War Debt hearted response of the colonial assemblies to the war effort had suggested that in its search for revenue, England could not rely on any cooperation
from the colonial governments. Only a system of taxation administered by London, the leaders of the empire believed, could effectively meet England’s needs.
At this crucial moment in Anglo-American relations, with the imperial system in desperate need of redefinition, George III became king in 1760 on the death of his grandfather. He brought two particularly unfortunate qualities to the office.
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION - 109
First, he was determined, unlike his two predecessors, to be an active and responsible monarch. In part because of pressure from his ambitious mother, he removed from power the long-standing and stable coalition of Whigs, who had (under Pitt and others) governed the empire for much of the century and whom the new king mistrusted. In their place, he created a new coalition of his own through patronage and bribes and gained an uneasy control of Parliament. The new ministries that emerged as a result of these changes were unstable, each lasting in office only about two years.
Second, the king had serious intellectual and psychological limitations that compounded his political difficulties. He suffered, apparently, from a rare disease that produced intermittent bouts of insanity. (Indeed, in the last years of his long reign he was, according to most accounts, deranged, George IIFs confined to the palace and unable to per-Shortcomings form any official functions.) Yet, even when George III was lucid and rational, which in the 1760s and 1770s was most of the time, he was painfully immature (he was only twenty-two when he ascended the throne) and insecure-striving constantly to prove his fitness for his position but time and again finding himself ill equipped to handle the challenges he seized for
GEORGE HI
George III was twenty-two years old when he ascended the throne in 1760, and for many years almost all portraits of him were highly formal, with the king dressed in elaborate ceremonial robes. This less formal painting dates from much later in his reign, after he had begun to suffer from the mental disorders that eventually consumed him. After 1810, he was blind and permanently deranged, barred from all official business by the Regency Act of 1811. His son (later King George IV) served as regent in those years until he became king after his father’s death in 1820. (© The Granger Collection, New York)
himself. The king's personality, therefore, contributed to both the instability and the intransigence of the British government during these critical years.
More immediately responsible for the problems that soon emerged with the colonies, however, was George Grenville, whom the king made prime minister in 1763. Grenville did not share his brother-in-law William Pitt’s sympathy with the American point of view. He agreed instead with the prevailing opinion within Britain that the colonists had been too long indulged and that they should be compelled to obey the laws and to pay a part of the cost of defending and administering the empire. He promptly began trying to impose a new system of control upon what had been a loose collection of colonial possessions in America.
The British and the Tribes
The western problem was the most urgent. With the departure of the French, settlers and traders from the English colonies moved immediately into the upper Ohio Valley. The Indians of the region objected to this intrusion, and an alliance of tribes, under the Ottawa chieftain Pontiac, struck back. To prevent an escalation of the fighting that might threaten western trade, the British government issued a ruling-the Proclamation of 1763-forbidding settlers to advance beyond a line drawn along the Appalachian Mountains.
Proclamation The Proclamation of 1763 was appealing of 1763 to the British for several reasons. It would allow London, rather than the provincial governments and their land-hungry constituents, to control the westward movement of the white population. Hence, westward expansion would proceed in an orderly manner, and conflicts with the tribes, which were both militarily costly and dangerous to trade, might be limited. Slower western settlement would also slow the population exodus from the coastal colonies, where
England’s most important markets and investments were. And it would reserve opportunities for land speculation and fur trading for English rather than colonial entrepreneurs.
Although the tribes were not enthusiastic about the Proclamation, which required them to cede still more land to the white settlers, many tribal groups supported the agreement as the best bargain available to them. The Cherokee, in particular, worked actively to hasten the drawing of the boundary, hoping to end white encroachments. Relations between the western tribes and the British improved in some areas after the Proclamation, partly as a result of the work of the Indian superintendents the British appointed. John Stuart was in charge of Indian affairs in the southern colonies, and Sir William Johnson in the northern ones. Both were sympathetic to Native American needs and lived among the tribes; Johnson married a Mohawk woman, Mary Brant, who was later to play an important role in the American Revolution.
In the end, however, the Proclamation of 1763 failed to meet even the modest expectations of the Native Americans. It had some effect in limiting colonial land speculation in the West and
110 « CHAPTER 4
in controlling the fur trade, but on the crucial point of the line of settlement it was ineffective. White settlers continued to
White	swarm across the boundary and to claim
Encroachment lands farther and farther into the Ohio Valley. The British authorities tried repeatedly to establish limits to the expansion but continually failed to prevent the white colonists from pushing the line of
settlement still farther west.
The Colonial Response
The Grenville ministry soon moved to increase its authority in the colonies in more direct ways. Regular British troops, London announced, would now be stationed permanently in America; and under the Mutiny Act of 1765 the colonists were required to assist in provisioning and maintaining the army. Ships of the British navy were assigned to patrol American waters and search for smugglers. The customs service was reorganized and enlarged. Royal officials were ordered to take up their colonial posts in person instead of sending substitutes. Colonial manufacturing was to be restricted so that it would not compete with the rapidly expanding industry of Great Britain.
The Sugar Act of 1764, designed in part to eliminate the illegal sugar trade between the continental colonies and the French and Spanish West Indies, strengthened enforce-Sugar	rnent of the duty on sugar (while low-
Currency	ering the duty on molasses, further
and Stamp damaging the market for sugar grown
Acts	in the colonies). It also established
new vice-admiralty courts in America to try accused smugglers-thus depriving them of the benefit of sympathetic local juries. The Currency Act of 1764 required the colonial assemblies to stop issuing paper money (a widespread practice during the war) and to retire on schedule all the paper money already in circulation. Most momentous of all, the Stamp Act of 1765 imposed a tax on most printed documents in the colonies: newspapers, almanacs, pamphlets,
deeds, wills, licenses.
The new imperial program was an effort to reapply to the colonies the old principles of mercantilism. And in some ways, it proved highly effective. British officials were soon collecting more than ten times as much annual revenue from America as before 1763. But the new policies created many more problems than they solved.
The colonists may have resented the new imperial regulations, but at first they found it difficult to resist them effectively. Americans continued to harbor as many grievances against one another as against the authorities in London. Often, the conflicts centered around tensions between the
Paxton Boys established societies of the Atlantic coast and the "backcountry” farther west, whose residents often felt isolated from, and underrepresented in, the colonial governments. These western settlers sometimes felt resentful because they lived closer to the worlds of the Indian tribes than the societies of the East. In
Regulator
Movement
1763, for example, a band of people from western Pennsylvania known as the "Paxton Boys” descended on Philadelphia with demands for relief from colonial (not British) taxes and for money to help them defend themselves against Indians; the colonial government averted bloodshed only by making con-cessions to them.
In 1771, a small-scale civil war broke out as a result of the so-called Regulator movement in North Carolina. The Regulators were farmers of the Carolina upcountry who organized in opposition to the high taxes that local sheriffs
(appointed by the colonial governor) collected. The western counties were badly underrepresented in the colonial assembly, and the Regulators failed to win redress of their grievances there. Finally, they armed themselves and began resisting tax collections by force. To suppress the revolt, Governor William Tryon raised an army of militiamen, mostly from the eastern counties, who defeated a band of 2,000 Regulators in the Battle of Alamance. Nine on each side were killed, and many others were wounded. Afterward, six Regulators were hanged for treason.
The bloodshed was exceptional, but bitter conflicts within the colonies were not. After 1763, however, the new policies of the British government began to create common grievances among virtually all colonists that to some degree counterbalanced these internal divisions.
Indeed, there was something in the Grenville program to antagonize everyone. Northern merchants believed they would suffer from restraints on commerce, closing opportunities for manufacturing, and increased taxes. Settlers in the northern backcountry resented the closing of the West to land speculation and fur trading. Southern planters, in debt to English merchants, feared having to pay additional taxes and losing their ability to ease their debts by speculating in western land. Professionals-ministers, lawyers, professors, and oth-ers-depended on merchants and planters for their livelihood and thus shared their concerns about the effects of English law. Small farmers, the largest group in the colonies, believed they would suffer from increased taxes and from the abolition of paper money, which had enabled them to pay their loans. Workers in towns opposed the restraints on manufacturing.
The new restrictions came, moreover, at the beginning of an economic depression. The British government, by pouring Postwar	money into the colonies to finance the
Depression fighting, had stimulated a wartime boom. When the flow of funds stopped after the peace in 1763, an economic bust followed. The imperial policies would, many colonists feared, doom them to permanent economic stagnation and a declining standard of living.
In reality, most Americans soon found ways to live with (or circumvent) the new British policies. The American economy was not, in fact, being destroyed. But economic anxieties were rising in the colonies nevertheless, and they created a growing sense of unease.
Whatever the economic consequences of the British government s programs, the political consequences were-in the
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION
• 111 ARCTIC OCEAN
Greenland
Bering
Sea
AS A
• : 'C




'	i ■* c
PACIF1C OCEAN
fc 0



Hudson
Bay
if
' “r'\ French Fishing A Rights
/ , 11 r '
,yJ Nezc
r < HUDSON’S BAY
SPANISH FLORIDA
St. Pierre and Miquelon
' ,	.	//A/NOVA
/; ivir a SC0TIA
(Mass.)
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
IO
yF

Gulf of Mexico
BELIZE
,jCuba
.; /
St. Dominigue
Jamaica
C a r i b b e a n S e a
Santo Domingo
Puerto Rico
MOSQUITO •*COAST
IORTH AMERICA IN 1763
The victory of the English over the French in the Seven Years' War (or, as it was known in America, the French and Indian War) reshaped the map of colonial North merica. Britain gained a vast new territory, formerly controlled by France—Canada, and a large area west of the Mississippi River—thus more than doubling the size of the British Empire in America, rench possessions in the New World dwindled to a few islands in the Caribbean. Spain continued to control a substantial empire in the North American interior. The red line along the western borders f the English colonies represents the line of settlement established by Britain in 1763. White settlers were not permitted to move beyond that line. Why did the British wish to restrict settlement of the western lands?
eyes of the colonists-far worse. Perhaps nowhere else in the late-eighteenth-century world did so large a proportion of the people take an active interest in public affairs. That was partly because Anglo-Americans were deeply attached to broad powers of self-government; and the colonists were determined to protect those powers. The keys to self-government, they believed, were the provincial assemblies; and the key to the power of the provincial assemblies was their long-established
Political Consequences of the Grenville
Program
right to give or withhold appropriations for the colonial governments, a right the British were now challenging. Home rule, therefore, was not something new and different that the colonists were striving to attain, but something old and familiar that
they desired to keep. The movement to resist the new imperial policies, a movement for which many would ultimately
112 • CHAPTER 4
PREPARING TO MEET THE PAXTON BOYS
The "Paxton Boys" were residents of western Pennsylvania who were declared outlaws by the assembly in Philadelphia after they launched an unauthorized attack on neighboring Conestoga Indians. Instead of surrendering, they armed themselves and marched on Philadelphia. This engraving satirizes the haphazard military preparations in the city for the expected invasion. An accompanying poem, expressing the contempt some colonists felt toward the urbanized, pacifist Quakers of Philadelphia, commented: “To kill the Paxtomans, they then did Advance, With Guns on their Shoulders, but how did they Prance.” Benjamin Franklin finally persuaded the Paxton rebels not to attack in return for greater representation in the legislature. (© Fotosearch/Getty Images)
fight and die, was at the same time democratic and conservative. It was a movement to conserve liberties Americans believed they already possessed.
STIRRINGS OF REVOLT
By the mid-1760s, a hardening of positions had begun in both England and America that would bring the colonies into increasing conflict with the mother country. The victorious war for empire had given the colonists a heightened sense of their own importance and a renewed commitment to protecting their political autonomy. But it had also given the British a strengthened belief in the need to tighten administration of the empire and use the colonies as a source of revenue. The result was a series of events that, more rapidly than anyone had imagined, shattered the British Empire in America.
The Stamp Act Crisis
Even if he had tried, Prime Minister Grenville could not have devised a better method for antagonizing and unifying the
Effects of the colonies than the Stamp Act of 1765. Stamp Act The Sugar Act of a year earlier had affected few people other than the New
England merchants. But the new tax fell on all Americans, and it evoked particular opposition from some of the most powerful members of the population. Merchants and lawyers were obliged to buy stamps for ships’ papers and legal documents. Tavern owners, often the political leaders of their neighborhoods, were required to buy stamps for their licenses. Printers-the most influential group in distributing information and ideas in colonial society-had to buy stamps for their newspapers and other publications.
The actual economic burdens of the Stamp Act were relatively light; the stamps were not expensive. What made the law offensive to the colonists was the precedent it seemed to set. In the past, Americans had rationalized the taxes and duties on colonial trade as measures to regulate commerce, not raise money. Some Americans had even managed to persuade themselves that the Sugar Act, which was in fact designed primarily to raise money, was not fundamentally different from the traditional imperial duties. The Stamp Act, however, they could interpret in only one way: it was a direct attempt by England to raise revenue in the colonies without the consent of the colonial assemblies. If this new tax passed without resistance, the door would be open for more burdensome taxation in the future.
Few colonists believed that they could do anything more than grumble and buy the stamps-until the Virginia House of
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION
• 113 THE ALTERNATIVES OF WILLIAM BURG
In the aftermath of the Boston Tea Party and in response to the Coercive Acts Great Britain enacted to punish the colonists, the First Continental Congress called on Americans to boycott British goods until the acts were repealed. In this drawing, a prosperous Virginia merchant is seen signing a pledge to honor the nonimportation agreement—not surprising, given the alternative, visible in the background of the picture: tar and feathers hanging from a post labeled "A Cure for the Refractory.” (© The Colonial Williamsburg Foundation) Burgesses sounded what one colonist called a "trumpet of sedition” that aroused Americans to action almost everywhere. The "trumpet” was the collective voice of a group of young Virginia aristocrats. They hoped, among other things, to challenge the power of tidewater planters who (in alliance with the royal governor) dominated Virginia politics. Foremost among the malcontents was Patrick Henry, who had already achieved fame for his fiery oratory and his occasional defiance of British authority. Henry made a dramatic speech to the House of Burgesses in May 1765, concluding with a vague prediction that if present policies were not revised, George III, like earlier tyrants, might lose his head. There were shocked cries of "Treason!” and, according to one witness, an immediate apology from Henry (although many years later he was quoted as having made the defiant reply: "If this be treason, make the most of it).
Henry introduced a set of resolutions declaring that Americans possessed the same rights as the English, especially
Virginia	the ri&ht to be CaXed by
Resolves	representatives; that Virginians should
pay no taxes except those voted by the Virginia assembly; and that anyone advocating the right of
Parliament to tax Virginians should be deemed an enemy of the colony. The House of Burgesses defeated the most extreme of Henry’s resolutions. All of them, however, were printed and circulated as the "Virginia Resolves” (creating an impression in other colonies that the people of Virginia were more militant than they actually were).
In Massachusetts at about the same time, James Otis persuaded his fellow members of the colonial assembly to call an intercolonial congress for action against the new tax. In October 1765, the Stamp Act Congress met in New York with delegates from nine colonies and decided to petition the king and the two houses of Parliament. Their petition conceded that Americans owed to Parliament "all due subordination,” but it denied that the colonies could rightfully be taxed except through their own provincial assemblies.
Meanwhile, in several colonial cities, crowds began taking the law into their own hands. During the summer of 1765, Sons of	serious riots broke out up and down
Liberty	the coast, the largest of them in Boston.
Men belonging to the newly organized Sons of Liberty terrorized stamp agents and burned the stamps. The agents, themselves Americans, hastily resigned; and the sale of stamps in the continental colonies ceased. In Boston, a crowd also attacked such pro-British "aristocrats” as the lieutenant governor, Thomas Hutchinson (who had privately opposed passage of the Stamp Act but who, as an officer of the crown, felt obliged to support it once it became law). The protesters pillaged Hutchinson’s elegant house and virtually destroyed it.
The Stamp Act crisis was a dangerous moment in the relationship between the colonies and the British government. But the crisis subsided, largely because England backed down. The authorities in London changed their attitude not because of the colonists’ defiance but because of economic pressure. Even before the Stamp Act, many New Englanders had stopped buying English goods to protest the Sugar Act of 1764. Now the colonial boycott spread, and the Sons of Liberty intimidated colonists who were reluctant to participate in it. The merchants of England, feeling the loss of much of their colonial market, begged Parliament to repeal the Stamp Act; and stories of unemployment, poverty, and discontent arose from English seaports and manufacturing towns.
The Marquis of Rockingham, who succeeded Grenville as prime minister in July 1765, tried to appease both the English merchants and the American colonists, and he finally con-
Parliament	vinced the king to kill the Stamp Act.
Retreats	On March 18, 1766, Parliament re-
pealed it. Rockingham’s opponents were strong and vociferous, and they insisted that unless England compelled the colonists to obey the Stamp Act, they would soon cease to obey any laws of Parliament. So, on the same day, to satisfy such critics, Parliament passed the Declaratory Act, asserting Parliament’s authority over the colonies "in all cases whatsoever.” In their rejoicing over the repeal of the Stamp Act, most Americans paid little attention to this
sweeping declaration of power.
114 • CHAPTER 4
Internal Rebellions
The conflicts with Britain were not the only uprisings emerging in the turbulent years of the 1760s. In addition to the Stamp Act crisis and other challenges to London, there were internal rebellions that had their roots in the class system in New York and New England. In the Hudson Valley in New York, great estates had grown up, whose owners had rented their land to small farmers. The revolutionary fervor of the time led many of these tenants to demand ownership of the land they worked. To emphasize their determination, they stopped paying rents. The challenge to landownership soon failed. But other challenges to landownership continued in other colonies. In Vermont, which still was governed by New York, insurgent farmers challenged landowners (many of them the same owners whom tenants had challenged on the Hudson) by taking up arms and demanding ownership of the land they
TORY’S DAY OF JUDGMENT” A
mob of American Patriots hoists a Loyalist neighbor up a flagpole in this woodcut, which is obviously sympathetic to the victim. The crowd is shown as fat, rowdy, and drunken. Public humiliations of Tories were not infrequent during the war. More common, however, was seizure of their property. (Library of Congress) worked. Ethan Allen (later a hero of the Revolutionary War and himself a land speculator) took up the cause of the Green Mountain farmers and accused the landowners of trying to “enslave a free people.” Allen eventually succeeded in making Vermont into a separate state, which broke up some of the large estates.
The Townshend Program
The reaction in England to the Rockingham government’s policy of appeasement was less enthusiastic than it was in America. English landlords, a powerful political force, angrily protested that the government had "sacrificed the landed gentlemen to the interests of traders and colonists.” They feared that backing down from taxing the colonies would lead the government to increase taxes on them. The king finally bowed to their pressure and dismissed the Rockingham ministry. To replace it, he called upon the aging but still powerful William Pitt to form a government. Pitt had been a strong critic of the Stamp Act and had a reputation in America as a friend of the colonists. Once in office, however, Pitt (now Lord Chatham) was so hobbled by gout and at times so incapacitated by mental illness that the actual leadership of his administration fell to the chancellor of the exchequer, Charles Townshend-a brilliant, flamboyant, and at times reckless politician known to his contemporaries variously as "the Weathercock” and "Champagne Charlie.”
Among Townshend’s first challenges was dealing with the continuing American grievances against Parliament, now
Mutiny Act most notably the Mutiny (or Quartering) Act of 1765, which required the colonists to provide quarters and supplies for the British troops in America. The British considered this a reasonable requirement. The troops were stationed in North America to protect the colonists from Indian or French attack and to defend the frontiers; lodging the troops in coastal cities was simply a way to reduce the costs to England of supplying them. To the colonists, however, the law was another assault
on their liberties.
They did not so much object to quartering the troops or providing them with supplies; they had been doing that voluntarily ever since the last years of the French and Indian War. They resented that these contributions were now mandatory, and they considered it another form of taxation without consent. The Massachusetts Assembly refused to vote the mandated supplies to the troops. The New York Assembly soon did likewise, posing an even greater challenge to imperial authority, since the army headquarters were in New York City.
To enforce the law and to try again to raise revenues in the colonies, Townshend steered two inflammatory measures through Parliament in 1767. The first disbanded the
Internal and New Yor^ Assembly until the colo-External	nists agreed to obey the Mutiny Act.
Taxes	(By singling out New York, Townshend
thought he would avoid Grenville’s
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION - 115
mistake of arousing all the colonies at once.) The second levied new taxes (known as the Townshend Duties) on various goods imported to the colonies from England-lead, paint, paper, and tea. The colonists could not logically object to taxation of this kind, Townshend reasoned, because it met standards they themselves had accepted. Benjamin Franklin, as a colonial agent in London trying to prevent the passage of the Stamp Act, had long ago argued for the distinction between "internal” and "external” taxes and had denounced the stamp duties as internal taxation. Townshend himself had considered the distinction laughable; but he was nevertheless imposing duties on what he believed were clearly external transactions.
Yet Townshend’s efforts to satisfy colonial grievances were to no avail. He might call them external taxes, but they were no more acceptable to colonial merchants than the Stamp Act. Their purpose, Americans believed, was the same as that of the Stamp Act: to raise revenue from the colonists without their consent. And the suspension of the New York Assembly, far from isolating New York, aroused the resentment of all the colonies. They considered this assault on the rights of one provincial government a precedent for the annihilation of the rights of all of them.
The Massachusetts Assembly took the lead in opposing the new measures by circulating a letter to all the colonial governments urging them to stand up against every tax, external or internal, imposed by Parliament. At first, the circular evoked little response in some of the legislatures (and ran into strong opposition in Pennsylvania’s). Then Lord Hillsborough, secretary of state for the colonies, issued a circular letter of his own from London in which he warned that assemblies endorsing the Massachusetts letter would be dissolved. Massachusetts defiantly reaffirmed its support for the circular. (The vote in the Assembly was 92 to 17, and for a time "ninety-two” became a patriotic rallying cry throughout British America.) The other colonies, including Pennsylvania, promptly rallied to the support of Massachusetts.
In addition to his other unpopular measures, Townshend tried to strengthen enforcement of commercial regulations in the colonies by, among other things, establishing a new board of customs commissioners in America. Townshend hoped the new board would stop the rampant corruption in the colonial customs houses, and to some extent his hopes were fulfilled. The new commissioners ended smuggling in Boston, their headquarters, although smugglers continued to carry on a busy trade in other colonial seaports.
The Boston merchants-accustomed to loose enforcement of the Navigation Acts and doubly aggrieved now that the new commission was diverting the lucrative smuggling trade-were Colonial	indignant and took the lead in organiz-
Boycotts	ing another boycott. In 1768, the mer-
chants of Philadelphia and New York joined them in a nonimportation agreement, and later some southern merchants and planters also agreed to cooperate. Colonists boycotted British goods subject to the Townshend Duties; and throughout the colonies, American homespun and
other domestic products became fashionable overnight, while English luxuries fell from favor.
Late in 1767, Charles Townshend suddenly died-before the consequences of his ill-conceived program had become fully apparent. The question of dealing with colonial resistance to the Townshend Duties fell, therefore, to the new prime minister, Lord North. Hoping to break the nonimportation agreement and divide the colonists, Lord North secured the repeal of all the Townshend Duties except the tax on tea in March 1770.
The Boston Massacre
Competition for Scarce Employment
The withdrawal of the Townshend Duties never had a chance to pacify colonial opinion. Before news of the repeal reached America, an event in Massachusetts raised colonial resentment to a new level of intensity. The colonists’ harassment of the new customs commissioners in Boston had grown so intense that the British government
had placed four regiments of regular troops inside the city. The presence of the "redcoats” was a constant affront to the colonists’ sense of their independence and a constant reminder of what they considered British oppression. In addition, British soldiers, poorly paid and poorly treated by the army, wanted jobs in their off-duty hours; and they competed with local workers in an already tight market. Clashes between them were frequent.
On the night of March 5, 1770, a few days after a particularly intense skirmish between workers at a ship-rigging factory and British soldiers who were trying to find work there, a crowd of dockworkers, "liberty boys,” and others began pelting the sentries at the customs house with rocks and snowballs. Hastily, Captain Thomas Preston of the British regiment lined up several of his men in front of the building to protect it. There was some scuffling; one of the soldiers was knocked down; and in the midst of it all, apparently, several British soldiers fired into the crowd, killing five people (among them a mulatto sailor, Crispus Attucks).
This murky incident, almost certainly the result of panic and confusion, was quickly transformed by local resistance leaders into the "Boston Massacre”-a graphic symbol of British oppression and brutality. The victims became popular martyrs; the event became the subject of many lurid (and inaccurate) accounts. A famous engraving by Paul Revere, widely reproduced and circulated, falsely portrayed the "massacre” as a carefully organized, calculated assault on a peaceful crowd. A jury of Massachusetts colonists found two British soldiers guilty of manslaughter and acquitted six others. Colonial pamphlets and newspapers, however, convinced many Americans that all of the soldiers were guilty of official murder. Year after year, resistance leaders marked the anniversary of the massacre with demonstrations and speeches.
The leading figure in fomenting public outrage over the Boston Massacre was Samuel Adams, the most effective radical in the colonies. Adams (a distant cousin of John Adams,
116
CHAPTER 4
THE BOSTON MASSACRE
(1770), BY PAUL REVERE This is one of many sensationalized engravings, by Revere and others, of the conflict between British troops and Boston laborers that became important propaganda documents for the Patriot cause in the 1770s. Among the victims of the massacre listed by Revere was Crispus Attucks, probably the first black man to die in the struggle for American independence. (Library of Congress) second president of the United States) was born in 1722 and Samuel Adams was thus somewhat older than other leaders of colonial protest. As a member of an earlier generation with strong ties to New England’s
Puritan past, he was particularly inclined to view public events in stern moral terms. A failure in business, he became an unflagging voice expressing outrage at British oppression. England, he argued, had become a morass of sin and corruption; only in America did public virtue survive. He spoke frequently at Boston town meetings; and as one unpopular
English policy followed another-the Townshend Duties, the placement of customs commissioners in Boston, the stationing of British troops in the city (with its violent results)-his message attracted increasing support. In 1772, he proposed the creation of a '"committee of correspondence” in Boston to publicize the grievances against England throughout the colony. He became its first head. Other colonies followed Massachusetts’s lead, and a loose network of political organizations grew up that kept the spirit of dissent alive through the 1770s.
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION
• 117 The Philosophy of Revolt
A superficial calm settled on the colonies for approximately three years after the Boston Massacre. But the crises of the 1760s had helped arouse enduring ideological challenges to England and had produced powerful instruments for publicizing colonial grievances. Gradually a political outlook gained a following in America that would ultimately serve to justify revolt.
The ideas that would support the Revolution emerged from many sources. Some were drawn from religious (particularly Puritan) sources or from the political experiences of the colonies. Others came from abroad. Most important, perhaps, were the "radical” ideas of those in Great Britain who stood in opposition to their government. Some were Scots, who considered the English state tyrannical. Others were embittered "country Whigs,” who felt excluded from power and considered the existing political system corrupt and oppressive. Drawing from some of the great philosophical minds of earlier generations-most notably John Locke-these English dissidents framed a powerful argument against their government.
Central to this emerging ideology was a new concept of what government should be. Because humans were inherently corrupt and selfish, government was necessary to protect individuals from the evil in one another. But because any government was run by corruptible people, the people needed safeguards against its possible abuses of power. Most people in both England and America had long considered the English constitution the best system ever devised to meet these necessities. By distributing power among the three elements of society-the monarchy, the aristocracy, and the common people-the English political system ensured that no individual or group
could exercise authority unchecked by another. Yet, by the mid-seventeenth century, dissidents in both England and America had become convinced that the constitution was in danger. A single center of power-the king and his ministers-was becoming so powerful that it could not be effectively checked. The system, the dissidents believed, was becoming a corrupt and dangerous tyranny.
Such arguments found little sympathy in most of England. The English constitution was not a written document or a fixed set of unchangeable rules. It was a general sense of the *way things are done,” and most people in England were willing to accept changes in it. Americans, by contrast, drew from their experience with colonial charters, in which the shape and powers of government were permanently inscribed on paper. They resisted the idea of a flexible, changing set of basic principles.
One basic principle, Americans believed, was the right of people to be taxed only with their own consent-a belief that gradually took shape in the widely repeated slogan No taxation without representation.” This clamor about representation” made little sense to the English. According to
England’s
Balanced
Constitution
CRUEL FATE OF THE LOYALISTS”
This British cartoon, published near the end of the American Revolution, shows three Indians, representing American revolutionaries, murdering six Loyalists: four by hanging, one by scalping, and one—appealing to Fate—about to be killed by an axe-wielding native. By using Indians to represent Anglo-American soldiers, the British were trying to equate the presumed savagery of Native Americans with the behavior of the revolutionaries. (The Library of Congress (LC-USZ62-1540)) English constitutional theory, members of Parliament did not represent individuals or particular geographic areas. Instead, each member represented the interests of the whole nation and indeed the whole empire, no matter where the member came from. The many boroughs of England that had no representative in Parliament, the whole of Ireland, and the colonies thousands of miles away-all were thus represented in the Parliament at London, even though they elected no representatives of their own. This was the theory of "virtual” representation. But Americans, drawing from their experiences with their town meetings and their colonial assemblies, believed in "actual” representation: every community was entitled to its own representative, elected by the people of that community and directly responsible to them. Since the colonists had none of their own representatives in Parliament, it followed that they were not represented there. Instead, Americans believed that the colonial assemblies played the same role within the colonies that Parliament did within England. The British Empire, the Americans began to argue, was a sort of federation of commonwealths, each with its own legislative body, all tied together by common loyalty to the king.
Such ideas illustrated a fundamental difference of opinion between England and America over the nature of sovereignty-Virtual VERSUS over the Question of where ultimate
power lay. By arguing that Parliament had the right to legislate for England and for the empire as a whole, but that only the provincial assemblies could legislate for the individual colonies, Americans were in effect arguing for a division of sovereignty. Parliament would be sovereign in some matters; the assemblies would be sovereign in others. To the British, such an argument was absurd. In any system of government
Actual
Representation
118 CHAPTER 4
there must be a single, ultimate authority. And since the empire was, in their view, a single, undivided unit, there could be only one authority within it: the English government of king and Parliament.
The Tea Excitement
The relatively calm first years of the 1770s disguised a growing sense of resentment at the increasingly heavy-handed British enforcement of the Navigation Acts. The customs commissioners, who remained in the colonies despite the repeal of the Townshend Duties, were mostly clumsy, intrusive, and arrogant officials. They harassed colonial merchants and seamen constantly with petty restrictions, and they also enriched themselves through graft and illegal seizures of merchandise.
Colonists also kept revolutionary sentiment alive through writing and talking. Dissenting leaflets, pamphlets, and books circulated widely through the colonies. In towns and cities, Revolutionary men gathered in churches, schools, Discourse	town squares, and above all in taverns
(see "Patterns of Popular Culture,” pp. 122-123) to discuss politics and express their growing disenchantment with English policy. The rise of revolutionary ideology was not simply a result of the ideas of intellectuals. It was also a product of a social process by which ordinary people heard, discussed, and absorbed new ideas.
The popular anger lying just beneath the surface was also visible in occasional acts of rebellion. At one point, colonists seized a British revenue ship on the lower Delaware River. And in 1772, angry residents of Rhode Island boarded the British
schooner Gaspee, set it afire, and sank it in Narragansett Bay. The British response to the Gaspee affair further inflamed American opinion. Instead of putting the accused attackers on trial in colonial courts, the British sent a special commission to America with power to send the defendants back to England for trial.
What finally revived the revolutionary fervor of the 1760s, however, was a new act of Parliament—one that the English government had expected to be relatively uncontroversial. It involved the business of selling tea. In 1773, Britain s East India Company (which had an official monopoly on trade with the Far East) was on the verge of bankruptcy and sitting on large stocks of tea that it could not sell in England. In an effort to save the company, the government passed the Tea Act of 1773, which gave the company the right to export its merchandise directly to the colonies without paying any of the navigation taxes that were imposed on the colonial merchants, who had traditionally served as the middlemen in such transactions. With these privileges, the East India Company could undersell American merchants and monopolize the colonial tea trade.
The Tea Act angered many colonists for several reasons. First, it enraged influential colonial merchants, who feared being replaced and bankrupted by a powerful monopoly. The East India Company's decision to grant franchises to certain American merchants for the sale of its tea created further re-
The Tea Act sentments among those excluded from this lucrative trade. More important, however, the Tea Act revived American passions about the issue of taxation without representation. The law provided no new tax on tea. But it exempted the East India Company from having to pay the normal customs duties. That put colonial
M..mdky Minting ember 37, 1773 ^HE TEA SHU’ King jmvru. e*cry Inhdtbannl, who wither
•• to	litr Liberty Aiuencjt, n UeUmi tv meet <Uth«
Hom, I he Muntu* prcvUely fEN vCloeh. bii
whM b bcit tvi be dune 00 tins ahruung Cttid.
To the PUBLIC.
iir. K.enfe of (he City relative to the Landing the Indi ompany s Tea, being fignified to Captain Lockyer, b
Committee, neverthelefs, it is the Delire of a Numbt 01 the Citizens, that at his Departure from hence, he lhould fe<
nWl1 Ey^s> their 9ete^ation of the Meafures purfued b die Mimftry and the India Company, to enflave this Country This yv ill be declared by the Convention of the People at his D< parture from this City; which will be on next Satu/day Morn.nf about nine oClocfc, when no Doubt, every Friend to this Count?
Z / b f 37 Be h wdl §ive the Notice about an Hour b< roie he embarks from Murray’s Wharf.
NEW YORK,
Armi. 2ia, ,,J4. Order of the CoMMITTBB. -f1
*
<f>
*
*
♦
♦
*
I
♦
*
*
THE BOSTON TEA PARTY
The artist Ramberg produced this wash drawing of the Boston Tea Party in 1773. A handbill i New York the folbwtng April illustrate how quickly the spirit of resistance spread to other colonies. (Le/t; © The Granger Collect!, 0 Peter Newark American Pictures/The Bridgeman Art Library; Bottom Right £) Bettmann/Corbis) Philadelphia newspaper ten days later and another distributed in
New York; Top Right: Private Collection/


THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION * 119
merchants at a grave competitive disadvantage. British Prime Minister Lord North assumed that most colonists would welcome the new law because it would reduce the price of tea to consumers by removing the middlemen. But resistance leaders in America argued that it was another insidious example of the results of an unconstitutional tax. Many colonists responded by boycotting tea.
The boycott was an important event in the history of colonial resistance. Unlike earlier protests, most of which had involved small numbers of people, the boycott mobilized large segments of the population. It also helped link the colonies in a common experience of mass popular protest. Particularly important to the movement were the activities of colonial women, who were among the principal consumers of tea and now became leaders of the effort to boycott it.
Women had played a significant role in resistance activities from the beginning. Several women (most prominently Mercy Otis Warren) had been important in writing the dissident literature-in Warren’s case, satirical plays-that did much to fan colonial resentments in the 1760s. Women had participated actively in anti-British riots and crowd activities in the 1760s; they had formed an informal organization-the Daughters of Liberty-that occasionally mocked their male counterparts as insufficiently militant. Now, as the sentiment for a boycott grew, some women mobilized as never before, determined (as the Daughters of Liberty had written) "that rather than Freedom, we’ll part with our Tea.”
In the last weeks of 1773, with strong popular support, leaders in various colonies made plans to prevent the East India Company from landing its cargoes in colonial ports. In Philadelphia and New York City, determined colonists kept the tea from leaving the company’s ships. In Charles Town, they stored it in a public warehouse. In Boston, after failing to turn back the three ships in the harbor, local Patriots staged a spectacular drama. On the evening of December 16, 1773,
three companies of fifty men each, masquerading as Mohawks, passed through a tremendous crowd of spectators (which served to protect them from official interference), went aboard the three ships, broke open the tea chests, and heaved them into the harbor. As the electrifying news of the Boston Yea party” spread, other seaports followed the example and staged similar acts of resistance.
When the Bostonians refused to pay for the property they had destroyed, George III and Lord North decided on a policy of coercion, to be applied only against Massachusetts-the chief center of resistance. In four acts of 1774, Parliament closed the port of Boston, drastically reduced colonial self-government, permitted royal officers to be tried in other colonies or in England when accused of crimes, and provided for the quarter-
Boston Tea Party
ing of troops in the colonists’ barns and empty houses.
Parliament followed these Coercive Acts-or, as they were more widely known in America, Intolerable Acts-with the
Cofrcvf Actc Quebec Act, which was separate from
COERCIVE ACTS
quite different in purpose. Its object was to provide a civil government for the
PAYING THE EXCISEMAN
This eighteenth-century satirical drawing by a British artist depicts Bostonians forcing tea down the throat of a customs official, whom they have tarred and feathered. In the background, colonists are dumping tea into the harbor (presumably a representation of the 1773 Boston Tea Party); and on the tree at right is a symbol of the Stamp Act, which the colonists had defied eight years earlier. (© GL Archive/Alamy) French-speaking Roman Catholic inhabitants of Canada and the Illinois country. The law extended the boundaries of Quebec to include the French communities between the Ohio and Mississippi Rivers. It also granted political rights to Roman Catholics and recognized the legality of the Roman Catholic Church within the enlarged province. In many ways it was a tolerant and long-overdue piece of legislation. But in the inflamed atmosphere of the time, many people in the thirteen English-speaking colonies considered it a threat. They were already alarmed by rumors that the Church of England was scheming to appoint a bishop for America who would impose Anglican authority on all the various sects. Since the line between the Church of England and the Church of Rome had always seemed to many Americans dangerously thin, the passage of the Quebec Act convinced some of them that a plot was afoot in London to subject Americans to the tyranny of the pope. Those interested in western lands, moreover, believed that the act would hinder westward expansion.
The Coercive Acts, far from isolating Massachusetts, made it a martyr to residents of other colonies and sparked new resistance up and down the coast. Colonial
Consequences legislatures passed a series of resolves
I	w
CONSIDER THE SOURCE /
4 /
TEA PARTIES
THE BOSTON
Tea Party of 1773 was a revolt against "taxation without representation. The poem "Tea, Destroyed by Indians” celebrates the action of the Boston Tea Party, expresses the colonists' resentments and complaints against the distant London government, and calls upon Boston patriots to continue to resist British actions. The twenty-first-century Tea Party movement became prominent in 2009. Although not an official political party, members tend to endorse Republican candidates. The modern Tea Party movement has borrowed its name from the Boston event that took place over 200 years ago, and has picked up some (although not all) of the ideas of the 1773 Boston Tea Party: hostility to distant authority (London then, Washington now) and resentment of taxes (imposed by Britain then, and by Washington now). Although taxation in our time does not really take place "without representation,” today's Tea Partiers certainly feel that contemporary taxation is as illegitimate as the Bostonians felt it was in 1773.
BOSTON TEA PARTY-1773
Tea, Destroyed by Indians
Poem honoring the Boston Tea Party, Dec. 1773
CHORUS:
Bostonian’s SONS keep up your Courage good,
Or Dye, like Martyrs, in fair Free-born Blood.
YE GLORIOUS SONS OF FREEDOM,
brave and bold, That has flood forth-fair LIBERTY to hold; Though you were INDIANS, come from distant shores, Like MEN you acted-not like savage Moors.
CHORUS
Our LIBERTY, and LIFE is now invaded,
And FREEDOM’S brightest Charms are darkly shaded; But, we will STAND-and think it noble mirth,
To DART the man that dare oppress the Earth.
CHORUS
How grand the Scene!-(No Tyrant shall oppose)
The TEA is sunk in spite of all our foes.
A NOBLE
SIGHT-to see th' accursed TEA Mingled with MUD-and ever for to be; For KING and PRINCE shall know that we are FREE.
CHORUS
Must we be still- and live on Blood-bought Ground, And not oppose the Tyrants cursed found?
We Scorn the thought-our views are well refin’d We Scorn those slavish shackles of the Mind,
"We've Souls that were not made to be confin’d.”
CHORUS
Could our Fore-fathers rise from their cold Graves, And view their Land, with all their Children SLAVES; What would they say! how would their Spirits rend, And, Thunder-strucken, to their Graves descend. CHORUS
Let us with hearts of steel now stand the task,
Throw off all darksome ways, nor wear a Mask.
Oh! may our noble Zeal support our frame,
And brand all Tyrants with eternal SHAME.
CHORUS
Bostonian s SONS keep up your Courage good,
And sink all Tyrants in their GUILTY BLOOD.
Source: www.masshist.org
J
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What is the prevailing tone of the document? To whom is the poem addressed? What specific complaints or re
sentments against the British government are expressed in the poem?	P	P
2.	How does the style of the document contribute to the sentiments it expresses? Why might this style have been
more effect a™„g the „,0„ist, feelings abM lhe Tea Par|y	? lhB“rf
!0 *
TEA PARTY MOVEMENT-2010
Although the Tea Party movement has no centralized leadership, one organization that claims to be the official home of the American Tea Party movement is TeaParty.org. A description and set of core beliefs provided by this organization appear below.
TeaParty.org Description and Core Beliefs
What Is the Tea Party?
The Tea Party is a grassroots movement that calls awareness to any issue that challenges the security, sovereignty, or domestic tranquility of our beloved nation, the United States of America.
From our founding, the Tea Party is the voice of the true owners of the United States, WE THE PEOPLE.
Many claim to be the founders of this movement-however, it was the brave souls of the men and women in 1773, known today as the Boston Tea Party, who dared defy the greatest military might on earth.
We are the beneficiaries of their courage. By joining the Tea Party, you are taking a stand for our nation. You will be upholding the grand principles set forth in the U.S. Constitution and Bill of Rights.
Non-negotiable core beliefs
Illegal Aliens Are Here Illegally.
Pro-Domestic Employment Is Indispensable. Stronger Military Is Essential.
Special Interests Eliminated.
Gun Ownership Is Sacred.
Government Must Be Downsized.
National Budget Must Be Balanced.
Deficit Spending Will End.
Bail-Out and Stimulus Plans Are Illegal. Reduce Personal Income Taxes A Must. Reduce Business Income Taxes Is Mandatory. Political Offices Available To Average Citizens Intrusive Government Stopped.
English As Core Language Is Required. Traditional Family Values Are Encouraged. Common Sense Constitutional.
Conservative Self-Governance.
(Source: Tea Party/1773 Tea Party)
MAKE CONNECTIONS
1.	How does the statement from TeaParty.org echo the sentiments expressed in the broadside about the Boston Tea Party of 1773?
2.	The message from TeaParty.org makes a specific connection to the Boston Tea Party of 1773. Do you think TeaParty.org is justified in claiming a connection to the original Tea Party?
Taverns in Revolutionary Massachusetts
colonial Massachusetts, as in many other American colonies in the 1760s and 1770s, taverns (or "public houses," or "pubs," as they came to be known) were crucial to the development of popular resistance to British rule. The Puritan culture of New England created some resistance to taverns, and there were continuing efforts by reformers to regulate or close them to reduce the problems caused by "public drunkenness," "lewd behavior," and anarchy. But as the commercial life of the colonies expanded, and as increasing numbers of people began living in towns and cities, tav-
erns became a central institution in American social life—and eventually in its political life as well. Taverns were appealing, of course, because they provided alcoholic drinks in a culture where the craving
for alcohol—and the extent of drunkenness—was very high. But taverns had other attractions as well. There were few other places where people could meet and talk openly in public, and to many colonists the life of the tavern came to seem the most democratic experience available to them. Gradually, many began to see the attacks on the public houses as efforts to increase the power of existing elites and suppress the freedoms of ordinary people. The tavern was a mostly male institution, just as politics was considered a mostly male concern. And so the fusion of male camaraderie and political discourse emerged naturally out of the tavern culture.
As the revolutionary crisis deepened, taverns and pubs became the central meeting places for discussions of the ideas that fueled resistance to British polices. Educated and uneducated men alike joined in animated discussions of events. Those who could not read—and there were many—could learn about the contents of revolutionary pamphlets from listening to tavern discussions. They could join in the discussion of the new republican ideas emerging in the Americas by participating in tavern celebrations of, for example, the anniversaries of resistance to the Stamp Act. Those anniversaries inspired elaborate toasts in public houses throughout the colonies. Such toasts were the equivalents of political speeches, and illiterate men could learn much from them about the political concepts that were circulating through the colonies.
THE SCALES OF JUSTICE
This sign for a Hartford tavern promises hospitality (from "the charming Patroness") and "entertainment" as well as food and drink. (CO The Connecticut Historical Society, Gift of Mrs. Morgan Brainard)
supporting Massachusetts. Women’s groups throughout the colonies mobilized to extend the boycotts of British goods and to create substitutes for the tea, textiles, and other commodities they were shunning.
COOPERATION AND WAR
Revolutions do not simply happen. They need organizers and leaders. Beginning in 1765, colonial leaders developed a variety of organizations for converting popular discontent into direct action-organizations that in time formed the basis for an independent government.
New Sources of Authority
The passage of authority from the royal government to the colonists themselves began on the local level, where the tradition of autonomy was already strong. In colony after colony, local institutions responded to the resistance movement by simply seizing authority on their own. At times, entirely new, extralegal bodies emerged semispontaneously and began to perform some of the functions of government. In Massachusetts in 1768, for example, Samuel Adams called
a convention of delegates from the towns of the colony to sit in place of the General Court, which the governor had dissolved. The Sons of Liberty, which Adams had helped organize in Massachusetts and which sprang up elsewhere as well, became another source of power. Its members at times formed disciplined bands of vigilantes who made certain that all colonists respected the boycotts and other forms of popular resistance. And in most colonies, committees of prominent citizens began meeting to perform additional political functions.
The most effective of these new groups were the committees of correspondence, which Adams had inaugurated in First	Massachusetts in 1772. Virginia later
Continental established the first intercolonial com-Congress	mittees of correspondence, which made
possible continuous cooperation among the colonies. Virginia also took the greatest step of all toward united action in 1774 when, after the royal governor dissolved the assembly, a special session met in the Raleigh Tavern at Williamsburg, declared that the Intolerable Acts menaced the liberties of every colony, and issued a call for a Continental Congress. Variously elected by the assemblies and by extralegal meetings, delegates from all the thirteen colonies except Georgia were present when, in September 1774, the First
122
tfl	Taverns were important sources of
information in an age before any wide distribution of newspapers. Tavernkeepers were often trusted informants and confidants to the Sons of Liberty and other activists, and they were fountains of information about the political and social turmoil of the time. Taverns were also the settings for political events. In 1770, for example, a report circulated through the taverns of Danvers, Massachusetts, about a local man who was continuing to sell tea despite the colonial boycott. The Sons of Liberty brought the seller to the Bell Tavern and persuaded
him to sign a confession and apology before a crowd of defiant men,
Almost all politicians found it necessary to visit taverns in colonial Massachusetts if they wanted
any real contact with the public. Samuel Adams spent considerable time in the public houses of Boston, where he sought to encourage resistance to British rule while taking care to drink moderately
TAVERNS AND POLITICS
The Green Dragon Tavern is where protestors planned the Boston Tea Party. (© The Granger Collection, New York) so as not to erode his stature as a leader. His cousin John Adams was somewhat more skeptical of taverns, more sensitive to the vices they encouraged. But he, too, recognized their political value. In taverns, he once said, "bastards, and legislatores are frequently begotten." •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	Why were taverns so important in educating colonists about the relationship with Britain?
2.	The tavern is described as a "mostly male institution" yet women often participated in political activities. Where might women have gathered and discussed political ideas (if not in the tavern)?
3.	What gathering places today serve the same purposes that taverns did in colonial America?
TO ALL BRAVE, HEALTHY, ABLE BODIED, AND WELL DISPOSED YOUNG MEN,
IN THIS NEIGHBOURHOOD, WHO HAVE ANY INCLINATION TO JOIN THE TROOPS, NOW RAISING UNDER
GENERAL WASHINGTON,
FOR THE DEFENCE
° K LIBERTIES AND INDEPEWENCE
OF THE UNITED STATES,
Againft the hoftile deftgnsK foreign enemies,
takenotice,
CRUITING PATRIOTS
This Revolutionary War recruiting poster attracted recruits by appealing to their riotism (asking them to defend "the liberties and independence of the United States ), their vam y ( y s ™'n9 ndsome clothing" and impressive bearing of soldiers), and their greed (by offering .hem a bounty of twelve dollars I sixty dollars a year"). (Library of Congress)
Continental Congress convened in Carpenter’s Hall in Philadelphia. They made five major decisions. First, in a very close vote, they rejected a plan (proposed by Joseph Galloway of Pennsylvania) for a colonial union under British authority (much like the earlier Albany Plan). Second, they endorsed a statement of grievances, whose tortured language reflected the conflicts among the delegates between moderates and extremists. The statement seemed to concede Parliament’s right to regulate colonial trade and addressed the king as "Most Gracious Sovereign”; but it also included a more extreme demand for the repeal of all the oppressive legislation passed since 1763. Third, they approved a series of resolutions, recommending, among other things, that the colonists make military preparations for defense against possible attack by the British troops in Boston. Fourth, they agreed to nonimportation, nonexportation, and nonconsumption as means of stopping all trade with Great Britain, and they formed a "Continental Association” to enforce the agreements. And fifth, when the delegates
123
124 • CHAPTER 4
THE BATTLES OF LEXINGTON AND CONCORD, 1775
This map shows the fabled series of events that led to the first battle of the American Revolution. On the night of April 18,1775, Paul Revere and William Dawes rode out from Boston to warn the outlying towns of the approach of British troops. Revere was captured just west of Lexington, but Dawes escaped and returned to Boston. The next morning, British forces moved out of Boston toward Lexington, where they met armed American minutemen on the Lexington common and exchanged fire. The British dispersed the Americans in Lexington. But they next moved on to Concord, where they encountered more armed minutemen, clashed again, and were driven back toward Boston. All along their line of march, they were harassed by riflemen. • What impact did the Battles of Lexington and Concord (and the later Battle of Bunker Hill, also shown on this map) have on colonial sentiment toward the British?
Paul Revere's ride, night of April 18, 1775 - William Dawes's ride, April 18, 1775
TROOP MOVEMENTS
g_______ American forces
i---- British forces
BATTLES AND ENTRENCHMENTS
American victory	British victory
American entrenchment
Road
adjourned, they agreed to meet again the next spring, thus indicating that they considered the Continental Congress a continuing organization.
Through their representatives in Philadelphia the colonies had, in effect, reaffirmed their autonomous status within the empire and declared something close to economic war to maintain that position. The more optimistic of the Americans hoped that this economic warfare alone would win a quick and bloodless victory, but the more pessimistic had their doubts. T expect no redress, but, on the contrary, increased resentment and double vengeance,” John Adams wrote to Patrick Henry; "we must fight.” And Henry replied, "By God, I am of your opinion.”
During the winter, the Parliament in London debated proposals for conciliating the colonists. Lord Chatham (William Pitt), the former prime minister, urged the withdrawal of troops from America. Edmund Burke called for the repeal of the Coercive Acts. But their efforts
The
Conciliatory
Propositions
were in vain. Lord North finally won approval early in 1775 for a series of measures known as the Conciliatory Propositions, but they were far less conciliatory than the approaches Burke or Chatham had urged. Parliament now proposed that the colonies, instead of being taxed directly by Parliament, would tax themselves at Parliament’s demand. With this offer, Lord North hoped to divide the American moderates, who he believed represented the views of the majority, from the extremist minority. But his offer was too little and too late. It did not reach America until after the first shots of war had been fired.
Lexington and Concord
For months, the farmers and townspeople of Massachusetts had been gathering arms and ammunition and training as "minutemen,” preparing to fight on a minute’s notice. The Continental Congress had approved preparations for a defensive war, and the citizen-soldiers awaited an aggressive move by the British regulars in Boston.
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION . 125
The Retreat
Jhm, /i’/uvrd te /t:r//ifin i’/f/rr {/smu/ <?/.''7fiZ/ Jhj/i iritis jfyirtfc/fy ihf jS/a/r/hrunan. fld//t<i
.JKJeevttrs . #'l MuAAr/ts . //* .j&e/tt/jt	<&&/ *j$arrt a# Jtiw&rXafid jSumt fyia/ y M
THE BRITISH RETREAT FROM CONCORD, 1775
This American cartoon satirizes the retreat of British forces from Concord after the battle there on April 19, 1775. Patriot forces are lined up on the left, and the retreating British forces (portrayed with dog heads, perhaps because many of the soldiers were "wild" Irish) straggle off at right—some fleeing in panic, others gloating over the booty they have plundered from the burning homes above. In its crude and exaggerated way, the cartoon depicts the success of Patriot forces at the Old North Bridge in Concord in repulsing a British contingent under the command of Lord Percy. As the redcoats retreated to Lexington and then to Boston, they continued to encounter fire from colonial forces, not arrayed in battle lines as shown here, but hidden along the road. One British soldier described the nightmarish withdrawal: "We were fired on from Houses and behind Trees ... the Country was ... full of Hills, Woods, stone Walls... which the Rebels did not fail to take advantage of." (© Anne S. K. Brown Military Collection, Brown University Library) In Boston, General Thomas Gage, commanding the British garrison, knew of the military preparations in the countryside General Thomas but considered his army too small to do Gage	anything until reinforcements arrived.
He resisted the advice of less cautious officers, who assured him that the Americans would never dare actually to fight, that they would back down quickly before any show of British force. Major John Pitcairn, for example, insisted that a single "small action,” such as the burning of a few towns, would "set everything to rights.”
General Gage still hesitated when he received orders from England to arrest the rebel leaders Sam Adams and John Hancock, known to be in the vicinity of Lexington. But when Gage heard that the minutemen had stored a large supply of gunpowder in Concord (eighteen miles from Boston), he finally decided to act. On the night of April 18, 1775, he sent a detachment of about 1,000 soldiers out from Boston on the road to Lexington and Concord. He intended to surprise the colonials and seize the illegal supplies without bloodshed.
But Patriots in Boston were watching the British movements closely, and during the night two horsemen, William Dawes and Paul Revere, rode out to warn the villages and farms. When the
British troops arrived in Lexington the next day, several dozen minutemen awaited them on the town common. Shots were fired and minutemen fell; eight of them were killed and ten more wounded. Advancing to Concord, the British discovered that the Americans had hastily removed most of the powder supply, but the British burned what was left of it. All along the road from Concord back to Boston, farmers hiding behind trees, rocks, and stone fences harassed the British with continual gunfire. By the end of the day, the British had lost almost three times as many men as the Americans.
The first shots-the "shots heard round the world,” as Americans later called them-had been fired. But who had fired them? According to one of the minutemen at Lexington, Major Pitcairn had shouted to the colonists on his arrival, "Disperse, ye rebels!” When the Americans ignored the command, he had given the order to fire. British officers and soldiers told a different story. They claimed that the minutemen had fired first, that only after seeing the flash of American guns had the British begun to shoot. Whatever the truth, the rebels succeeded in circulating their account well ahead of the British version, adorning it with lurid tales of British atrocities. The effect was to rally to the rebel cause thousands of colonists, north and south, who previously had had little enthusiasm for
126 CHAPTER 4
war. Jeremy Lister, a minuteman in Lexington, wrote later: "We got all over the bay and landed on the opposite shore betwixt twelve and one O’clock and was on our March by one, which was at first through some swamps and slips of the Sea till we got into the Road leading to Lexington soon after which the Country people begun to fire their alarm guns light their Beacons, to raise the Country. ... To the best of my recollection about 4 oClock in the morning being the 19th of April the 5 front Compys. was ordered to Load which we did.”
It was not immediately clear to the British, and even to many Americans, that the skirmishes at Lexington and Concord were the first battles of a war. Many saw them as simply another example of the tensions that
Thf
Revolution had been afflictin§ Anglo-American re-Begins	lations for years. But whether they rec-
ognized it at the time or not, the British and the Americans had taken a decisive step. The War for
Independence had begun.
LOOKING BACK
When the French and Indian War ended in 1763, it might have seemed reasonable to expect that relations between the English colonists in America and Great Britain itself would have been cemented more firmly than ever. America and Britain had fought together in a great war against the French and their Indian allies. They had won impressive victories. They had vastly expanded the size of the British Empire.
But the end of the French and Indian War altered the imperial relationship forever, in ways that ultimately drove Americans to rebel against English rule and begin another war for independence. To the British, the lesson of the war was that the colonies in America needed firmer control from London. The empire was now much bigger, and it needed better administration. The war had produced great debts, and the Americans-among the principal beneficiaries of the war-should help pay them. And so for more than a decade after the end of the fighting, the British tried one strategy after another
to tighten control over and extract money from the colonies, all of them in the end failures.
To the colonists, this effort to tighten imperial rule was both a betrayal of the sacrifices they had made in the war and a challenge to their long-developing assumptions about the rights of English people to rule themselves. Gradually, white Americans came to see in the British policies evidence of a conspiracy to establish tyranny in the New World. And so throughout the 1760s and 1770s, the colonists developed ever more overt and effective forms of resistance. By the time the first shots were fired in the American Revolution in 1775, Britain and America-once bonded so closely to one another that most white Americans considered themselves just as English as any resident of London-had come to view each other as two very different societies. Their differences, which came to seem irreconcilable, propelled them into a war that would change the course of history. •
Key T erms/ People/ Places / Events
Albany Plan 100
Benjamin Franklin 100
Boston Massacre 115
Boston Tea Party 119
Charles Townshend 114
Coercive Acts 119
Committees of correspondence 123
Creoles 101
Currency Act 111
Daughters of Liberty 119
First Continental Congress 123 George Grenville 109 Impressment 103 Iroquois Confederacy 101 Lord North 115 Mutiny Act 110 Patrick Henry 113 Proclamation of 1763 109 Quebec Act 119 Samuel Adams 116
Sons of Liberty 122 Stamp Act 111 Stamp Act Congress 113 Sugar Act 113 Tea Act 118 Townshend Duties 115 Virginia Resolves 113 William Pitt 103
RECALL AND REFLECT
1.	How did the Seven Years’ War and its outcome affect Britain’s attitude and policies toward its North American colonies?
2.	Which Native American tribes fought in the French and Indian War, and how did the war’s outcome affect them? What were the war’s effects on Native Americans?
3.	How and why did the colonists’ attitude toward Britain change from the time of the Seven Years’ War to the beginning of the American Revolution?
4.	What were the philosophical underpinnings of the colonists’ revolt against Britain?
5.	What did the slogan "No taxation without representation” mean, and why was it a rallying cry for the colonists?
THE EMPIRE IN TRANSITION * 127
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
1754
Albany Plan for intercolonial cooperation rejected
French and Indian War begins in North America
____ 1756_
Seven Years' War begins in Europe
_____ 1771
Regulator movement quelled in North Carolina
1770
Boston Massacre
Most Townshend Duties repealed
1760
George III becomes king
French army surrenders to Amherst at Montreal
1764
Sugar Act passed Currency Act passed
______ _	1773 __ ____ _
Tea Act passed Bostonians stage tea party
1772
Committees of correspondence established in Boston Gaspee incident in Rhode Island
1765
Stamp Act crisis Mutiny Act passed
1766
Stamp Act repealed Declaratory Act passed
1775	_
Clashes at Lexington and Concord begin American Revolution
J774
Intolerable Acts passed
First Continental Congress meets at Philadelphia
1767
Townshend Duties imposed
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
LOOKING AHEAD

1. What were the military strategies (both British and American) of each of the three phases of the American Revolution? How successful were these strategies during each phase?
SURRENDER OF CORNWALLIS
On October 19, 1781, Lord Charles Cornwallis surrendered to George Washington at Yorktown. This painting by James S. Baillie depicts the event that ended the hostilities between Britain and the United States. (© Gilder Lehrman Collection, New York, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library)
2. How did the American Revolution become an international conflict, not just a colonial war against the British?
3. How did the new national government of the United States reflect the assumptions of republicanism?
SETTING THE STAGE
TWO STRUGGLES OCCURRED SIMULTANEOUSLY
during the seven years of war that began in April 1775. One was the military conflict with Great Britain. The second was a political battle within America. The military conflict was, by the standards of later wars, relatively modest. By the standards of its own day, however, it was unusually savage, pitting not only army against army, but also the civilian population against an external force. The shift of the war from a traditional, conventional struggle to a new kind of conflict—a revolutionary war for liberation—made it possible for the American army finally to defeat the vastly more powerful British.
At the same time, Americans were wrestling with the great political questions the conflict necessarily produced: first, whether to demand independence from Britain; second, how to structure the new nation they had proclaimed; and third, how to deal with questions the Revolution had raised about slavery, the rights of Indians, the role of women, and limits of religious tolerance in the new American society. Only the first question had been resolved when the British surrendered at Yorktown in 1781. But by then the United States had already established itself as a new kind of nation, one dedicated to enlightened ideals.
Neither at the time nor later did the United States always follow those ideals. At the same time that revolutionaries were celebrating the "rights of man," they were consolidating the enslavement of African Americans, depriving Loyalists (American colonists who supported the British during the Revolution) of rights and property, barring women from participation in public life, and denying Indian tribes the limited rights the British had accorded them. Yet despite these contradictions, they believed that the nation should try to live up to the ideals proclaimed in the Revolution as a continuing influence on the future history of the United States.
THE STATES UNITED
Although many Americans had been anticipating a military conflict with Britain for months, even years, the actual beginning of hostilities in 1775 found the colonies generally unprepared for the enormous challenges awaiting them. America was an unformed nation, with a population less than a third as large as the 9 million of Great Britain, and with vastly inferior economic and military resources. It faced the task of mobilizing for war against the world’s greatest armed power at the same time Americans were deeply divided about what they were fighting for.
Defining American War Aims
Three weeks after the Battles of Lexington and Concord, the Second Continental Congress met in the State House in Philadelphia, with delegates from every colony except Georgia, which sent no representative until the following autumn. The members agreed to support the war, but they disagreed, at times profoundly, about its purpose.
At one pole was a group led by the Adams cousins (John and Samuel), Richard Henry Lee of Virginia, and others, who favored complete independence from Great Britain. At the other pole was a group led by such moderates as John Dickinson of Pennsylvania, who hoped for modest reforms in the imperial relationship that would permit an early reconciliation with Great Britain. Most of the delegates tried to find some middle ground between these positions. They demonstrated their uncertainty in two very different declarations, which they adopted in quick succession. They approved one last, conciliatory appeal to the king, the "Olive Branch
CH
Petition,” which the British government rejected. Then, on July 6, 1775, they adopted an antagonistic "Declaration of the Causes and Necessity of Taking Up Arms’ It proclaimed that the British government had left the American people with only two alternatives: "unconditional submission to the tyranny of irritated ministers or resistance by force.”
• 129
